Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2919.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37-2-82 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-2 entitled "State
Purchases" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-2-82. Utilization of North American Contractor Certification companies.
(a) All public works renovation projects that exceed an aggregate amount of one million
dollars ($1,000,000), and all new construction projects that exceed an aggregate amount of five
million dollars ($5,000,000), that include glazing work, shall have glazing work performed by
North American Contractor Certification (“NACC”) certified companies and initially, on and after
July 1, 2024, shall have one architectural glass and metal technician (“AGMT”) certified worker
employed by the company or contractor. On and after January 1, 2025, each crew performing work
that meets the criteria of this section shall have one AGMT certified worker on site. On and after
January 1, 2026, for each crew performing work that meets the criteria of this section, twenty-five
percent (25%) of that crew shall be comprised of AGMT certified individuals on site. On and after
January 1, 2027, for each crew performing work that meets the criteria of the section, fifty percent
(50%) of that crew shall be comprised of AGMT certified individuals on site.
(b) As used herein, the term “glazing work” includes, but is not limited to, replacement and
installation of windows, curtain walls, interior glass partitions, glass handrails, aluminum
entrances, skylights, store fronts, and general installation of architectural glass and metal.
(c)(1) The department of labor and training shall enforce the provisions of this section. If
the director, or designee, determines that a violation of these provisions has occurred, the director,

or designee, shall order a hearing at a time and place to be specified, and shall give notice, together
with a copy of the complaint or the purpose thereof, or a statement of the facts disclosed upon
investigation, which notice shall be served personally or by mail on any person, business,
corporation, or entity of any kind affected thereby.
(2) The person, business, corporation, or entity shall have an opportunity to be heard in
respect to the matters complained of at the time and place specified in the notice.
(3) The hearing shall be conducted by the director, or designee. The hearing officer in the
hearing shall be deemed to have jurisdiction and dispositive authority to hear and adjudicate the
matter, and shall have the right to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine witnesses. The
enforcement of a subpoena issued under this section shall be regulated by civil practice law and the
rules of civil procedure. The hearing shall be expeditiously conducted and upon such hearing the
hearing officer shall determine the issues raised and shall make a determination and enter an order
within thirty (30) days of the close of the hearing, and forthwith serve a copy of the order, with a
notice of the filing, upon the parties to the proceeding, personally or by mail.
(4) The order shall dismiss the complaint or determine that a violation of the provisions of
this section occurred. The order shall represent a final action by the department of labor and
training.
(d) Any contractor or subcontractor determined to have violated the provisions of this
section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500)
and not greater than three thousand dollars ($3,000), and shall be subject to the revocation of any
relevant professional or occupational license, if the violation is deemed to have been intentional or
egregious.
(e) This section is applicable to all public works projects that fit the other criteria as
provided in this section.
(f) For purposes of this section, "public works project" includes any project financed,
undertaken, managed, or contracted for, by the state, its departments, agencies, authorities, public
corporations, quasi-public corporations, municipalities, school committees, or any other political
subdivision. The requirements of this section shall apply to all such public works projects, without
regard to the source of funding or procurement method; provided that, the project meets the
monetary thresholds in subsection (a) of this section and includes glazing work as defined in
subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004460
========
LC004460 - Page 2 of 3